Utah statutes.
70A-7a-509.   Adequate compliance with commercial contract.

Whether a document of title is adequate to fulfill the obligations of a contract for sale, a contract for lease, or the conditions of a letter of credit is determined by Chapter 2, Uniform Commercial Code - Sales, 2a, Uniform Commercial Code - Leases, or 5, Uniform Commercial Code - Letters of Credit.



Enacted by Chapter 42, 2006 General Session

